Wyoming, session 2025, SF0103.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:
Section 1. W.S. 9-2-1014.4 and 21-16-2001 are created
to read:
9-2-1014.4. Funds and expenditures for diversity,
equity and inclusion efforts prohibited.
(a) As used in this section:
(i) "Diversity, equity and inclusion" includes
any of the following:
(A) Influencing hiring or employment
practices with respect to race, sex, color or ethnicity,
other than through the use of race and gender neutral
practices in accordance with any applicable state and
federal law;
(B) Promoting differential treatment of or
providing special benefits to persons on the basis of race,
color or ethnicity;
(C) Promoting policies or procedures
designed or implemented to promote differential treatment
or special benefits based on race, color or ethnicity,
1

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0103
ENROLLED ACT NO. 61, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
except for policies or procedures necessary to comply with
any state law, federal law or applicable court order;
(D) Conducting trainings, programs or
activities designed or implemented to promote differential
treatment or special benefits for persons based on race,
color, ethnicity or gender dysphoria, except for trainings,
programs or activities that are for the sole purpose of
ensuring compliance with state law, federal law or any
applicable court order;
(E) A program, policy or practice,
regardless of its title, that seeks to advance the
principles of prioritizing group identity over individual
merit or that promotes outcomes based on race, sex, color,
ethnicity or national origin unless explicitly required by
federal law.
(ii) "Entity" means any governmental entity that
will receive a legislative appropriation, including
agencies of the executive branch, the offices of the five
(5) statewide elected officials, the legislature, the
judiciary, community colleges, the University of Wyoming,
the Wyoming department of transportation, the game and fish
department, counties, municipalities and school districts;
(iii) "Federally recognized Indian tribe" means
a tribal government and its citizens who have an
acknowledged government-to-government relationship with the
United States of America.
(b) As a condition of receiving or expending any
monies or funds appropriated, each governmental entity
shall not expend any appropriated funds or funds received
from bequests, charges, deposits, donations, endowments,
2

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0103
ENROLLED ACT NO. 61, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
fees, grants, gifts, tuition and any other source for
programs or activities that, unless federal law otherwise
requires:
(i) Establish or maintain a diversity, equity
and inclusion office or program;
(ii) Hire or assign an employee or a contracted
person to perform the duties associated with a diversity,
equity and inclusion office or program;
(iii) Compel, require, induce or solicit any
person to provide or abide by a diversity, equity and
inclusion statement or give preferential treatment to any
person based on a diversity, equity or inclusion statement;
(iv) Give preference on the basis of race, sex,
color, ethnicity or national origin to an applicant for
employment, an employee or a participant in any core
function of the entity;
(v) Require, as a condition of employment,
enrollment, a contract or the receipt of funds, the
participation in diversity, equity and inclusion training.
(c) Nothing in this section shall be construed to:
(i) Prohibit the use or consideration of bona
fide qualifications based on sex that are reasonably
necessary to the normal operation of public higher
education;
(ii) Prohibit the University of Wyoming or
Wyoming community colleges, or an employee thereof, from
3

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0103
ENROLLED ACT NO. 61, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
submitting documentation or a statement for purposes of a
grant or to comply with accreditation requirements;
(iii) Prohibit the provision of support
services, including trainings, intended to familiarize
students, faculty and staff with the Eastern Shoshone Tribe
and the Northern Arapaho Tribe, or other federally
recognized Indian tribes or groups identified as a
political class, classification or identity;
(iv) Prohibit a governmental entity, or an
employee thereof, from submitting documentation or a
statement for purposes of a grant.
(d) For purposes of this section, "diversity, equity
and inclusion office or program" shall not include:
(i) Academic course instruction;
(ii) The completion or dissemination of
scholarly research or creative works by students, faculty
and other research personnel of the University of Wyoming
or Wyoming community colleges;
(iii) An activity of a student organization
registered with or recognized by the University of Wyoming
or a Wyoming community college;
(iv) Guest speakers or performers at the
University of Wyoming or a Wyoming community college on a
short-term engagement;
(v) Data collection.
(e) The following shall apply to this section:
4

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0103
ENROLLED ACT NO. 61, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
(i) Federally recognized Indian tribes and their
citizens are recognized by federal law and court rulings as
a political class, classification or identity. Tribes and
their members are not a race or a racial classification for
purposes of this section;
(ii) As a political class, classification or
identity, federally recognized Indian tribes and programs,
degrees, classes or endowments related to federally
recognized Indian tribes or Indian history, culture,
language and traditions, are not diversity, equity and
inclusion as defined by this section. Nothing in this
section shall be construed to apply to federally recognized
Indian tribes.
ARTICLE 20
DIVERSITY RELATED INITIATIVES AND FUNDING
21-16-2001. Restrictions on required courses for
diversity, equity and inclusion.
(a) As used in this section:
(i) "Constrain" means failure during any
semester or academic unit to provide sufficient open seats
in alternative courses for a student to complete or
progress toward completion of degree or program
requirements;
(ii) "Related content" means instruction
advocating the concepts prohibited by W.S. 9-2-1014.4(b)
and does not include identifying and discussing historical
movements, ideologies or instances of racial hatred or
5

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0103
ENROLLED ACT NO. 61, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
discrimination, including but not limited to slavery,
Indian removal, the Holocaust or Japanese-American
internment;
(iii) "Related course" means any course whose
course description, course overview, course objectives,
proposed student learning outcomes, written examinations or
written or oral assignments for which the student will
receive a grade that includes related content;
(iv) "Related practice":
(A) Includes any requirement or guidance
that a course instructor include or curate materials on the
basis of race, sex or gender dysphoria;
(B) Includes participating in any workshop,
training, seminar or professional development on any
related content;
(C) Does not include any programming
explicitly required by, and limited to, the institutional
obligations to comply with state or federal law or an
applicable court order.
(b) In prescribing the studies to be pursued at the
University of Wyoming or a Wyoming community college, the
board of trustees of the University of Wyoming and the
district boards of each community college shall establish
curricula and designate courses in a manner that does not
require or constrain students to expend tuition or other
funds on, or enroll in, a related course in order to
satisfy the requirements of any academic degree program,
including general education, major, minor or certificate
requirements, subject to subsection (d) of this section.
6

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0103
ENROLLED ACT NO. 61, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
(c) The board of trustees of the University of
Wyoming and the district boards of each community college,
or any employee or professional thereof, shall not require,
solicit or incentivize faculty or students to apply or
participate in related practices, or include related
content in any required course, as a condition of approval,
designation or listing as part of any academic degree
program, including any major, minor or certificate
requirements or as a condition of consideration in any
faculty member's performance assessment, tenure, salary
adjustment or any other incentive, subject to subsection
(d) of this section.
(d) Academic degree program requirements of any
major, minor, certificate or department whose title clearly
establishes its course of study as primarily focused on
racial, ethnic or gender studies may be exempted from the
requirements of subsections (b) and (c) of this section in
writing by the board of trustees or the district board, as
applicable, subject to the following:
(i) No student shall be required or constrained
to enroll in any exempted program, department or course to
satisfy the requirements of any other academic degree
program;
(ii) The title of any currently established
department, major, minor or certificate program shall not
be altered or replaced to establish an emphasis on racial,
ethnic or gender studies.
Section 2.
7

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0103
ENROLLED ACT NO. 61, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
(a) There is appropriated five hundred fifty thousand
dollars ($550,000.00) from the general fund to the
University of Wyoming to provide medical education and
training, and administrative costs thereof, for the first
cohort of five (5) students under an agreement with the
University of Utah school of medicine. Funds from this
general fund appropriation shall be expended by the
University of Wyoming provided that:
(i) The board of trustees of the University of
Wyoming has entered into a contract with the University of
Utah school of medicine under W.S. 21-17-109;
(ii) Students receiving medical education and
training under this section shall comply with the state of
Utah's diversity, equity and inclusion laws as they pertain
to instruction and training provided at the University of
Utah school of medicine;
(iii) The board of trustees of the University of
Wyoming obtains an agreement with any student receiving
medical education and training as specified in W.S.
21-17-109(d); and
(iv) All other provisions of W.S. 21-17-109 are
satisfied.
(b) This appropriation shall not be transferred or
expended for any other purpose. It is the intent of the
legislature that this appropriation be doubled and funding
for five (5) additional medical students each academic year
be included in the University of Wyoming's standard budget
for the immediately succeeding fiscal biennium.
Section 3.
8

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0103
ENROLLED ACT NO. 61, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
(a) This act shall apply to all funds that are
appropriated or received on and after the effective date of
this act.
(b) Nothing in this act shall be construed to alter,
amend or impair any contract or other agreement entered
into before the effective date of this act.
Section 4. This act is effective July 1, 2025.
(END)
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
Governor
TIME APPROVED: _________
DATE APPROVED: _________
I hereby certify that this act originated in the Senate.
Chief Clerk
9